Louisiana, session 2026, HB787.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:5026(A)(5) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§5026. High school core curriculum requirements; TOPS-Tech
A. To be eligible for a TOPS-Tech Award pursuant to this Chapter, the
student shall have successfully completed the core curriculum requirements of R.S.
17:5025 or the core curriculum defined as follows:
* * *
(5) At least nine credits in Jump Start course sequences, workplace
experiences, and credentials. A student shall complete a regionally designed series
of Career and Technical Education Jump Start coursework and workplace-based
learning experiences leading to a statewide or regional Jump Start credential. This
shall include courses and workplace experiences specific to the credential, courses
related to foundational career skills requirements in Jump Start, and other courses,
including career electives, that the Jump Start regional team determines are
appropriate for the career major. One of these credits shall be Computer Science,
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-376 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 787
unless Computer Science is taken to fulfill one credit as provided in Paragraph (2)
or (3) of this Subsection.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 17:5025(8), 5025.7, and 5026(F) are hereby repealed in their entirety.